North Carolina, session 2025, SB925.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-5-2, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of one million dollars
($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated in the form of a
grant to Forsyth County to be used for the Cure Violence program to address violence.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S925-v-1*